Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 9. Licensing and Operations

Cross references. —

For Long Term Care Choices Program, see §§

42-6-101

et seq.

§ 35-2-901.
Definitions; applicability of provisions.

As used in this act:

“Acute care” means short term care provided in a hospital;

“Ambulatory surgical center” means a facility which provides surgical treatment to patients not requiring hospitalization and is not part of a hospital or offices of private physicians, dentists or podiatrists;

“Birthing center” means a facility which operates for the primary purpose of performing deliveries and is not part of a hospital;

“Boarding home” means a dwelling or rooming house operated by any person, firm or corporation engaged in the business of operating a home for the purpose of letting rooms for rent and providing meals and personal daily living care, but not habilitative or nursing care, for persons not related to the owner. Boarding home does not include a lodging facility or an apartment in which only room and board is provided;

“Construction area” means thirty (30) highway miles, from any existing nursing care facility or hospital with swing beds to the site of the proposed nursing care facility, as determined by utilizing the state map prepared by the Wyoming department of transportation;

“Department” means the department of health;

“Division” means the designated division within the department of health;

“Freestanding diagnostic testing center” means a mobile or permanent facility which provides diagnostic testing but not treatment and is not part of the private offices of health care professionals operating within the scope of their licenses;

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 119, § 2.

“Health care facility” means any ambulatory surgical center, assisted living facility, adult day care facility, adult foster care home, alternative eldercare home, birthing center, boarding home, freestanding diagnostic testing center, home health agency, hospice, hospital, freestanding emergency center, intermediate care facility for people with intellectual disability, medical assistance facility, nursing care facility, rehabilitation facility and renal dialysis center;

“Home health agency” means an agency primarily engaged in arranging and directly providing nursing or other health care services to persons at their residence;

“Hospice” means a program of care for the terminally ill and their families given in a home or health facility which provides medical, palliative, psychological, spiritual and supportive care and treatment. Hospice care may include short-term respite care for non-hospice patients, if the primary activity of the hospice is the provision of hospice services to terminally ill individuals and provided that the respite care is paid by the patient or by a private third party payor and not through any governmental third party payment program;

“Hospital” means an institution or a unit in an institution providing one (1) or more of the following to patients by or under the supervision of an organized medical staff:

Diagnostic and therapeutic services for medical diagnosis, treatment and care of injured, disabled or sick persons;

Rehabilitation services for the rehabilitation of injured, disabled or sick persons;

Acute care;

Psychiatric care;

Swing beds.

“Intermediate care facility for people with intellectual disability” means a facility which provides on a regular basis health related care and training to persons with intellectual disabilities or persons with related conditions, who do not require the degree of care and treatment of a hospital or nursing facility and services above the need of a boarding home. The term also means “intermediate care facility for the mentally retarded” or “ICFMR” or “ICFs/MR” as those terms are used in federal law and in other laws, rules and regulations;

“Medical assistance facility” means a facility which provides inpatient care to ill or injured persons prior to their transportation to a hospital or provides inpatient care to persons needing that care for a period of no longer than sixty (60) hours and is located more than thirty (30) miles from the nearest Wyoming hospital;

“Nursing care facility” means a facility providing assisted living care, nursing care, rehabilitative and other related services;

“Physician” means a doctor of medicine or osteopathy licensed to practice medicine or surgery under state law;

“Psychiatric care” means the in-patient care and treatment of persons with a mental diagnosis;

“Rehabilitation facility” means an outpatient or residential facility which is operated for the primary purpose of assisting the rehabilitation of disabled persons including persons with acquired brain injury by providing comprehensive medical evaluations and services, psychological and social services, or vocational evaluations and training or any combination of these services and in which the major portion of the services is furnished within the facility;

“Renal dialysis center” means a freestanding facility for treatment of kidney diseases;

“Swing bed” means a special designation for a hospital which has a program to provide specialized in-patient long term care. Any medical-surgical bed in a hospital can be designated as a swing bed;

“Assisted living facility” means a dwelling operated by any person, firm or corporation engaged in providing limited nursing care, personal care and boarding home care, but not habilitative care, for persons not related to the owner of the facility. This definition may include facilities with secured units and facilities dedicated to the special care and services for people with Alzheimer’s disease or other dementia conditions;

“Adult day care facility” means any facility not otherwise certified by the department of health, engaged in the business of providing activities of daily living support and supervision services programming based on a social model, to four (4) or more persons eighteen (18) years of age or older with physical or mental disabilities;

“Adult foster care home” means a home where care is provided for up to five (5) adults who are not related to the provider by blood, marriage or adoption, except in special circumstances, in need of long term care in a home like atmosphere. “Adult foster care home” does not include any residential facility otherwise licensed or funded by the state of Wyoming. The homes shall be regulated in accordance with this act and with the Wyoming Long Term Care Choices Act, which shall govern in case of conflict with this act;

“Alternative eldercare home” means a facility as defined in W.S. 42-6-102(a)(iii). The homes shall be regulated in accordance with this act and with the Wyoming Long Term Care Choices Act which shall govern in case of conflict with this act;

“Freestanding emergency center” means a facility that provides services twenty-four (24) hours a day, seven (7) days a week for life threatening emergency medical conditions and is at a location separate from a hospital;

“This act” means W.S.

35-2-901

through

35-2-913

.

This act does not apply to hospitals or any other facility or agency operated by the federal government which would otherwise be required to be licensed under this act or to any person providing health care services within the scope of his license in a private office.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 277, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; ch. 241, § 3; 1993, ch. 174, § 1; 1997, ch. 162, § 1; 1999, ch. 119, §§ 1, 2; ch. 181, § 1; 2005, ch. 132 § 1; ch. 243, § 2; 2006, ch. 56, § 1; 2007, ch. 219, § 2; 2008, ch. 70, § 1; 2009, ch. 22, § 1; 2015 ch. 115, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2015 ch. 176, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2016 ch. 99, § 2, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2005 amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, by ch. 132, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, added the last sentence in (a)(xxii).

The second
2005 amendment, by ch. 243, § 2, in (a)(xxiv), substituted “W.S.

35-2-912

” for “W.S.

35-2-910

.”

Laws 2005, ch. 243, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2005.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2006 amendment,

in (a)(v), substituted “highway miles, from any existing” for “mile radius from the center of the closest community in Wyoming to a,” and inserted “to the site of the proposed nursing care facility.”

Laws 2006, ch. 56, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2006.

The 2007 amendment,

in (a)(x), inserted “adult foster care home, alternative eldercare home,” following “adult day care facility”; added (a)(xxiv) through (a)(xxv) and redesignated the existing paragraphs accordingly.

Laws 2007, ch. 219, §
4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, §
8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2007.

The 2008 amendment,

substituted “people with intellectual disability” for “the mentally retarded” or similar language in (a)(x) and (a)(x)(iv); added the last sentence in (a)(x)(iv) and made a related change.

Laws 2008, ch. 70, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 7, 2008.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added “or residential” and “including persons with acquired brain injury”in (a)(xix).

The 2015 amendments. —

The first
2015 amendment, by ch. 115, § 1, effective July 1, 2015, in (a)(xii), added the last sentence.

The second
2015 amendment, by ch. 176, § 1, effective July 1, 2015, in (a)(xxiv), deleted the second sentence and inserted “care” after “foster” to the third sentence.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, added “freestanding emergency center” following “hospital” in (a)(x), renumbered former (a)(xxvi) as (a)(xxvii), added (a)(xxvi), and in (a)(xxvii), substituted “35-2-913” for “35-2-912.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2006, ch. 117, § 1, effective July 1, 2006, provides:

“(a)

As used in this act:

“(i)

“Acute care hospital” means a hospital licensed in Wyoming pursuant to
W.S.

35-2-901

through

35-2-911

and which provides acute patient care;

“(ii)

“Ambulance service” means an ambulance service licensed in Wyoming pursuant to
W.S.

33-36-102

through

33-36-113

and which provides emergency medical transportation to hospitals or emergency rooms;

“(iii)

“Department” means the Wyoming department of health;

“(iv)

“Incident” means an admission, both inpatient and outpatient, involving traumatic care for an individual patient within a one (1) year period to a single hospital. Admissions of the same patient for causes not directly related to an earlier admission shall be considered a separate incident;

“(v)

“Trauma care services” means services to patients with at least one (1) injury diagnosis code, using the International Classification of Diseases, 9th Edition, from 800.0 through 904, 925 through 929, 940 through 959.9, and 994.7, plus at least one (1) of the following:

“(A)

Hospitalization for one (1) calendar day;

“(B)

Admission to the intensive care unit or monitored bed unit;

“(C)

Cardiac or respiratory arrest on route to the hospital or emergency room;

“(D)

Dead on arrival at the facility;

“(E)

Transfer from or to another acute care hospital;

“(F)

Admission directly from the emergency room to the operating room;

“(G)

Trauma team activation;

“(H)

Meets prehospital triage criteria;

“(J)

Ambulance services providing patient transportation to a hospital or emergency room.

“(b)

Acute care hospitals or ambulance services shall be reimbursed on a per incident basis, subject to the following:

“(i)

There is compliance with the reporting requirements of the Wyoming trauma care program registry before the request for reimbursement;

“(ii)

Reimbursement shall be available for costs incurred after June 30, 2006 and before July 1, 2007;

“(iii)

Requests for reimbursement may be submitted to the health department for payment only after one hundred eighty (180) days have elapsed from the date the bill for the services rendered was sent to the patient or his representative.

“(c)

The department shall promulgate rules and regulations to administer this program on behalf of the state of Wyoming. The rules and regulations shall include provisions for:

“(i)

Ensuring that reimbursements do not exceed the appropriated funds;

“(ii)

Limiting reimbursement to the necessary support of the poor;

“(iii)

Preventing duplication from this appropriation and insurance;

“(iv)

Reimbursing hospitals for trauma service costs and ambulance services for transporting patients to a hospital or emergency room.

“(d)

The department may contract with a fiscal agent to make the actual payments and conduct any necessary audits of reimbursement requests. Reimbursement requests shall be made in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The department or its agent on its behalf may request any documentation it deems necessary to support any request for reimbursement.

“(e)

The department shall not reimburse any one (1) acute care hospital or ambulance service in a cumulative amount greater than twenty-five percent (25%) of the appropriation in section 2 of this act. However, if the department reasonably concludes as of May 31, 2007, that the appropriation will not be fully expended, the remaining funds may be used to reimburse hospitals on a pro rata basis above the twenty-five percent (25%) limit of this subsection, subject to the requirements of subsection (b) of this section.”

Laws 2006, ch. 119, § 1 and 3, effective July 1, 2006, establishes a magnet hospital grant program by the department of health, to support the reduction of nursing shortages in Wyoming hospitals. Section 3 establishes a program to provide grants and technical assistance in order to promote quality nursing practices, working environment, retention of nursing staff and improved outcomes for patients.

Alzheimer's study. —

Laws 2005, ch. 211, § 1, appropriates $20,000 from the budget reserve account to the department of health to study Medicaid reimbursement rates for care of Alzheimer's disease patients. The study is to include at a minimum: (1) current Medicaid reimbursement rates for care of Alzheimer's disease patients and patients with other dementias as they compare to average long term care costs; (2) projected need over 10 years for beds in long term care facilities in the state to care for Alzheimer's disease patients; and (3) recommendations regarding the Medicaid reimbursement rate for care of Alzheimer's disease patients in this state. The department is to provide results of the study and recommendations to the joint labor, health and social services and the joint appropriations interim committees not later than October 1, 2005.

Laws 2005, ch. 211, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2005.

§ 35-2-902.
License required.

No person shall establish any health care facility in this state without a valid license issued pursuant to this act.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 277, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-2-901(a)(xxiv).

§ 35-2-903.
Application for license; submission of evidence prerequisite to issuance.

An applicant for a license under this act shall file a sworn application with the division on a form provided by the division. The form shall request the following information:

The applicant’s name;

The type of health care facility to be operated;

A description of and the location of the facility buildings;

The name of the person in charge of the health care facility;

Whether the applicant has had a license to operate a health care facility or agency providing health care services in this or any other state denied, suspended, revoked or otherwise terminated for cause and the specific reasons for such action. Evidence that the facility subject to the application is currently in compliance with all applicable statutes, rules and regulations is required;

Evidence that the applicant is capable of complying with applicable rules and regulations;

Such other information as the division may require pursuant to rules promulgated under this act.

An application by other than an individual shall be made by two (2) officers of the organization or by its managing agents.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 277, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-2-901(a)(xxiv).

§ 35-2-904.
Issuance of license; fee; duration; renewal; transferability; provisional licenses; procedures.

The division shall issue a license under this act:

If the applicant is in compliance with this act and in substantial compliance with the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this act; and

Upon payment of a license fee for each health care facility as specified in subsection (g) of this section. The department may adopt rules which provide for reasonable fees for health care facilities not specified in subsection (g) of this section in amounts not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00) designed to recover administrative and operational expenses of the department in conducting its licensure program under this article for those facilities.

Licenses are issued for a period of one (1) year beginning on July 1 of the year of issuance and ending on June 30 of the succeeding year. The full fee is due whether the license is issued for the entire year or for part of the year.

Licenses are renewed annually upon payment of the license fee unless suspended or revoked pursuant to W.S.

35-2-905

.

Fees collected under this act shall be deposited in the general fund.

Licenses are not assignable or transferable.

Applicants not complying with this act and not substantially complying with the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this act may be granted a provisional license subject to restrictions imposed by the division if the operation of the facility will not endanger the health, safety and welfare of patients. All applicants found in noncompliance shall be notified of the reason for noncompliance.

Health care facilities shall be assessed the following fees:

Adult day care facility . . . . . $250.00;

Adult foster care home . . . . . $250.00;

Ambulatory surgical center . . . . . $500.00;

Assisted living facility:

For a facility with a bed capacity of at least one (1) but not more than twenty-five (25) . . . . . $250.00;

For a facility with a bed capacity of more than twenty-five (25) but not more than fifty (50) . . . . . $500.00;

For a facility with a bed capacity of more than fifty (50) . . . . . $1,000.00.

Birthing center . . . . . $500.00;

Boarding home in an amount established by the department within this range . . . . . $500.00-$750.00;

Critical access hospital . . . . . $500.00;

Renal dialysis center . . . . . $500.00;

Freestanding diagnostic testing center . . . . . $500.00;

Freestanding emergency center . . . . . $500.00;

Home health agency . . . . . $150.00;

Hospice facility . . . . . $250.00;

Hospital . . . . . $1,000.00;

Intermediate care facility for people with intellectual disability . . . . . $250.00;

Medical assistance facility . . . . . $250.00;

Nursing care facility:

For a facility with a bed capacity of at least one (1) but not more than twenty-five (25) . . . . . $250.00;

For a facility with a bed capacity of more than twenty-five (25) but not more than fifty (50) . . . . . $500.00;

For a facility with a bed capacity of more than fifty (50) . . . . . $1,000.00.

Psychiatric hospital . . . . . $1,000.00;

Rehabilitation facility . . . . . $500.00;

Rehabilitation hospital . . . . . $500.00.

In addition to the fees imposed under subsection (g) of this section, if a licensed health care facility changes its name, location or number of beds, the facility shall pay a fee in the amount of two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) for a revised license.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 277, § 1; 1993, ch. 57, § 1; 2021 ch. 122, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, in the first sentence of (a)(ii), deleted "as established by the department" following "license fee" and added "as specified in subsection (g) of this section," in the second sentence, substituted "may " for "shall," added "for health care facilities not specified in subsection (g) of this section in amounts" and "for those facilities"; and added (g) and (h).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-2-901(a)(xxiv).

§ 35-2-905.
Conditions, monitoring or revoking a license.

The division may place conditions upon a license, install a division approved monitor or manager at the owner’s or operator’s expense, suspend admissions, or deny, suspend or revoke a license issued under this act if a licensee:

Violates any provision of this act or the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this act;

Permits, aids or abets the commission of any illegal act by a licensee;

Conducts practices detrimental to the health, safety or welfare of the patients of the licensee;

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 2.

Fails to pay a nursing care facility assessment and the department determines to suspend or revoke the license as provided in W.S. 42-8-107(b)(ii).

No license issued pursuant to this act shall be suspended or revoked or have conditions placed upon it or admissions suspended nor shall the division install an approved monitor or manager without notice to the licensee and an opportunity for a hearing under W.S.

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

.

If the division suspends the admission of new patients to a health care facility, the health care facility shall be provided an opportunity to abate the condition or conditions prior to suspension of admissions. If the conditions leading to the suspension of new admissions continue unabated beyond the period allowed for abatement, the division may continue the suspension of new admissions, or suspend or revoke the license.

Any hearing held by the division under this section shall be held in the city or town in which the facility is located, or in the closest city or town with appropriate facilities for a hearing.

If the division finds that conditions in a health care facility are in violation of this act and rules and regulations adopted under this act to the extent that there exists a substantial and immediate threat to the health or safety of patients, it may summarily suspend the license of that facility and take action necessary to protect the health and safety of patients. In cases of suspension under this subsection, the licensee shall be afforded an opportunity for a hearing within ten (10) days after the suspension.

If a license is revoked pursuant to this act, an application for a new license may be made to the division only after the conditions upon which revocation was based have been corrected and evidence of this fact has been furnished to the division. A new license shall be granted only if the applicant is in compliance with all provisions of this act and rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this act.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 277, § 1; 2008, ch. 116, § 2; 2011, ch. 105, § 2.

The 2008 amendment,

repealed (a)(iv) which read: “Fails to comply with W.S.

35-2-801

through 35-2-807 [terminated] or to substantially comply with any rule or regulation promulgated pursuant to those statutes.”

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

The 2011 amendment,

added (a)(v).

Laws 2011, ch. 105, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2011.

Editor's notes. —

Sections

35-2-801

through 35-2-807, referred to in subsection (a)(iv), were terminated in 1991 by Laws 1985, ch. 217, § 2, as amended by Laws 1988, ch. 47, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-2-901(a)(xxiv).

§ 35-2-906.
Construction and expansion of facilities; exemption.

A licensee who contemplates construction of or alteration or addition to a health care facility shall submit plans and specifications to the division for preliminary inspection and approval prior to commencing construction. Significant changes to the original plans must also be submitted and approved prior to implementation. The plans and any changes shall indicate any increase in the number of beds.

Nursing care facility beds shall not be expanded or constructed if the average of all the nursing care bed occupancy, excluding veteran administration beds, in the construction area is eighty-five percent (85%) or less based upon the annual occupancy report prepared by the division.

Notwithstanding the other provisions of this section any nursing care facility or hospital may, in any two (2) year period, increase its bed capacity by ten percent (10%) of the current nursing care facility bed capacity or by not more than ten (10) beds.

and (e) Repealed by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 87, § 2.

Beds in adult foster care homes and beds in alternative eldercare homes constructed pursuant to the pilot programs authorized in W.S.

42-6-104

and

42-6-105

shall not be considered as nursing care facility beds for the purposes of this section.

Beds constructed at any health care facility owned or operated by the department shall be exempt from subsections (b) and (c) of this section.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 277, § 1; 1992, ch. 12, § 2; 1997, ch. 123, § 1; 1999, ch. 20, § 1; 2001, ch. 52, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 87, §§ 1, 2; 2006, ch. 56, § 1; 2007, ch. 219, § 2; 2016 ch. 44, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 5, § 1, effective February 13, 2017.

The 2006 amendment,

in (b), inserted “average of all the,” deleted “eighty-eight percent (88%) or less until January 1, 2004, then” following “area is,” and deleted “thereafter” following “less.”

Laws 2006, ch. 56, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2006.

The 2007 amendment

added (f).

Laws 2007, ch. 219, §
4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, §
8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2007.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, added (g).

The 2017 amendment

, in (g), added “subsections (b) and (c) of” prior to “this section.”

Laws 2017, ch. 5, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 13, 2017.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1989, ch. 277, §§ 2 and 3(b), effective June 30, 1993, repealed this section.

Laws 1992, ch. 12, § 1, amended Laws 1989, ch. 277, § 2, so that this section is no longer repealed.

Laws 1992, ch. 12, § 3, repealed
Laws 1989, ch. 277, §
3(b).

§ 35-2-907.
Inspection of licensed establishments; exceptions; assisted living facility inspection procedure.

Except as otherwise provided in this section every licensed health care facility shall be periodically inspected by the division under rules and regulations promulgated by the department. A licensed health care facility which has been accredited by a nationally recognized accrediting body approved by federal regulations shall be granted a license renewal without further inspection. Inspection reports shall be prepared on forms prescribed by the division. Licensees accredited by the nationally recognized accrediting body shall submit the inspection report pursuant to its accreditation. If the standards of the nationally recognized accrediting body fail to meet or exceed the state standards for licensure, the division may inspect the licensed facility with regard to those matters which did not meet state standards.

Except as required in administrative and judicial proceedings, information obtained from licensees under this act is subject to public disclosure only after deletion of information which reveals the identity of patients, persons who file complaints with the division and employees of the health care facility.

The division shall:

Provide for the selection of an inspector to inspect and evaluate an applicant for an assisted living facility;

Approve and establish a fee to be paid by the applicant to the selected inspector. The division shall notify the applicant of the inspection fee prior to the inspection and evaluation;

Act on the application within thirty (30) days after receiving a report from the selected inspector on the inspection and evaluation of the applicant.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 277, § 1; 1993, ch. 174, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-2-901(a)(xxiv).

§ 35-2-908.
Rules and regulations.

The department shall promulgate and enforce reasonable rules and regulations necessary to protect the health, safety and welfare of patients of health care facilities licensed under this act.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 277, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-2-901(a)(xxiv).

§ 35-2-909.
Penalties for violations.

Except for violations otherwise punishable as a felony under the laws of this state, any person establishing or operating a facility or providing a service without first obtaining a license as required in this act is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not to exceed seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both. Each calendar week or portion thereof during which a violation continues is a separate offense.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 277, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-2-901(a)(xxiv).

§ 35-2-910.
Quality management functions for health care facilities; confidentiality; immunity; whistle blowing; peer review.

Each licensee shall implement a quality management function to evaluate and improve patient and resident care and services in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the division. Quality management information relating to the evaluation or improvement of the quality of health care services is confidential. Any person who in good faith and within the scope of the functions of a quality management program participates in the reporting, collection, evaluation, or use of quality management information or performs other functions as part of a quality management program with regard to a specific circumstance shall be immune from suit in any civil action based on such functions brought by a health care provider or person to whom the quality information pertains. In no event shall this immunity apply to any negligent or intentional act or omission in the provision of care.

Health care facilities subject to or licensed pursuant to this act shall not harass, threaten discipline or in any manner discriminate against any resident, patient or employee of any health care facility for reporting to the division a violation of any state or federal law or rule and regulation. Any employee found to have knowingly made a false report to the division shall be subject to disciplinary action by the employing health care facility, including but not limited to, dismissal.

No hospital shall be issued a license or have its license renewed unless it provides for the review of professional practices in the hospital for the purpose of reducing morbidity and mortality and for the improvement of the care of patients in the hospital. This review shall include, but not be limited to:

The quality and necessity of the care provided to patients as rendered in the hospital;

The prevention of complications and deaths occurring in the hospital;

The review of medical treatments and diagnostic and surgical procedures in order to ensure safe and adequate treatment of patients in the hospital; and

The evaluation of medical and health care services and the qualifications and professional competence of persons performing or seeking to perform those services.

The review required in subsection (c) of this section shall be performed according to the decision of a hospital’s governing board by:

A peer review committee appointed by the organized medical staff of the hospital;

A state, local or specialty medical society; or

Any other organization of physicians established pursuant to state or federal law and engaged by the hospital for the purposes of subsection (c) of this section.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 277, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-2-901(a)(xxiv).

§ 35-2-911.
Nonbinding functional assessments.

The department may, with the consent of the person seeking admission into a nursing care facility or his representative, conduct a nonbinding functional assessment for that person at the state’s expense.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 129, § 1.

§ 35-2-912.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by the terms of Laws 2005, ch. 243, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 2005, ch. 243, § 1, related to mandatory reporting of safety events. The repeal language was included in the text of the statute as enacted in 2005, and became effective June 30, 2010.

§ 35-2-913.
Exceptions.

No freestanding emergency center shall require separate licensure under this act when operated by the provider based emergency department of a Wyoming licensed hospital.

On and before June 30, 2025, freestanding emergency centers operated by a hospital district or rural health care district shall not require licensure under this act provided a hospital transfer agreement is in place.

Any freestanding emergency center shall accept patients regardless of age, Medicare, Medicaid or other insurance status or ability to pay. A freestanding emergency center not owned by a Wyoming hospital shall have an appropriate hospital transfer agreement in place.

A license to operate a freestanding emergency center shall not be construed as a license to operate a hospital and shall not allow any freestanding emergency center to hold a patient within its facility for more than twenty-four (24) hours unless an emergency arises that prevents the safe transport of the patient.

History.

2016 ch. 99, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2019 ch. 68, § 1, effective February 19, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2016, ch. 99, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2016. Approved March 11, 2016.